Utah statutes.
63M-1-3201.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Board" means the STEM Action Center Board created in Section 63M-1-3202.

(2)  "Educator" has the meaning defined in Section 53A-6-103.

(3)  "Office" means the Governor's Office of Economic Development.

(4)  "Provider" means a provider, selected by staff of the board and staff of the Utah State Board of Education, on behalf of the board:

(a)  through a request for proposals process; or

(b)  through a direct award or sole source procurement process for a pilot described in Section 63M-1-3205.

(5)  "STEM" means science, technology, engineering, and mathematics.

(6)  "STEM Action Center" means the center described in Section 63M-1-3204.



Enacted by Chapter 336, 2013 General Session

